Hawaii statutes.
§664-22 Jurisdiction. The circuit
courts shall have jurisdiction within their respective circuits to hear and
determine without the intervention of a jury all controversies respecting the
fencing of land and the maintenance of fences in accordance with this part. [L
1931, c 101, §2; RL 1935, §3672; RL 1945, §10213; RL 1955, §234-21; HRS
§664-22; am L 1972, c 90, §6(f)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next